src/morphology/stems/punctuation.lexc
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@hum.uit.no or feedback@divvun.no

!! !!!Punctuation

LEXICON Punctuation

!! !!Clause boundary symbols:

!! Period, comma, etc.

 %,+CLB:%,         # ;
 %.+CLB:%.         # ;
 %.%.+CLB:%.%.     # ;
 %.%.%.+CLB:%.%.%. # ;
 %:+CLB:%:         # ;
 %;+CLB:%;         # ;
 ^excl+CLB:%!      # ;
 ^pipe+CLB:%|      # ;
 %?+CLB:%?         # ;
 …+CLB:…           # ;
 ¿+CLB:¿           # ; ! Only seen as noise.
 ¶+CLB:¶           # ;


!! !!Miscellaneous symbols, abbreviation symbols

!! These could be moved to abbr-sme-lex.txt: §, $, €, ...

 §+N+ABBR+Use/Circ:§ PUNCTconnector ;    ! §:s	!
 §§+N+ABBR+Use/Circ:§§ PUNCTconnector ;  ! §:ain	!
 $+N+ABBR+Use/Circ:$  PUNCTconnector ;    ! $:s	!
 €+N+ABBR+Use/Circ:€  PUNCTconnector ;    ! €:s	!
 £+N+ABBR+Use/Circ:£  PUNCTconnector ;    ! €:s	!
 ®+N+ABBR:® # ;
 ©+N+ABBR:© # ;


!! !!Single punctuation marks

  √+PUNCT:√   # ;
  ◊+PUNCT:◊   # ;
  •+PUNCT:•   # ;
  ●+PUNCT:●   # ;
  ·+PUNCT:·   # ;
   ּ+PUNCT:ּ    # ;
  ·+PUNCT:·   # ;
  -+PUNCT:-   # ; ! hyphen
 --+PUNCT:--  # ; ! double hyphen
  –+PUNCT:–   # ; ! endash
  —+PUNCT:—   # ; ! emdash
  ―+PUNCT:―   # ; ! horizontal bar
  −+PUNCT:−   # ; !  
  =+PUNCT:=   # ;
  ≈+PUNCT:≈   # ;
 %%+PUNCT:%%  # ;
  &+PUNCT:&   # ;
 %"+PUNCT:%"  # ;
  '+PUNCT:'7  # ; ! We use "'7" to avoid the CG symbol of ái'gi etc.
 %*+PUNCT:%*  # ;
  ++PUNCT:+   # ;
  ±+PUNCT:±   # ;
  `+PUNCT:`   # ;
  ´+PUNCT:´   # ;
  /+PUNCT:/   # ;
+/-+PUNCT:+/- # ;
 %~+PUNCT:%~  # ;

  §+N+ABBR+Sg+Nom:§ #  ; !Quick fix
  §+N+ABBR+Sg+Acc:§ #  ; !Quick fix
  §+N+ABBR+Sg+Gen:§ # ; !Quick fix
  §§+N+ABBR+Sg+Nom:§§ # ; !Quick fix
  §§+N+ABBR+Sg+Acc:§§ # ; !Quick fix
  §§+N+ABBR+Sg+Gen:§§ # ; !Quick fix


!! !!Paired punctuation marks

!! Quotation marks, parentheses, etc.

 »+PUNCT+RIGHT:»7     # ; ! XXX Does not work!
 «+PUNCT+LEFT:«7      # ;
 %“+PUNCT+LEFT:%“     # ;
 %„+PUNCT+LEFT:%„     # ;
 %”+PUNCT+RIGHT:%”    # ;
 %‘+PUNCT+LEFT:%‘     # ;
 %’+PUNCT+RIGHT:%’    # ;
 %‹+PUNCT+LEFT:%‹     # ;
 %›+PUNCT+RIGHT:%›    # ;
 %(+PUNCT+LEFT:%(     # ;
 %)+PUNCT+RIGHT:%)    # ;
 %[+PUNCT+LEFT:%[     # ;
 %]+PUNCT+RIGHT:%]    # ;
 %{+PUNCT+LEFT:%{     # ;
 %}+PUNCT+RIGHT:%}    # ;
 %<+PUNCT+LEFT:%[%<%] # ;
 %>+PUNCT+LEFT:%[%>%] # ;




!! !!Lexica for introducing case tags

!! This is for symbols functioning as abbreviation
!! of words, rather than as text structuring symbols,
!! i.e. for $ and €, but not for , and «.

LEXICON PUNCTconnector
 +Sg+Nom+: # ;              ! §
 :%: PUNCTsuff ;	        ! §:sne
 +Err/Orth: PUNCTsuff ;		! §esne
 +Err/Orth:%-e PUNCTsuff ;	! §-esne
 +Err/Orth:%'e PUNCTsuff ;	! §'esne

LEXICON PUNCTsuff
 +Sg+Gen:n # ;
 +Sg+Acc:m # ;
 +Sg+Ill:se # ;
 +Sg+Ine:sne # ;
 +Sg+Ela:ste # ;
 +Sg+Com:ine # ;
   +Ess:ine # ;
+Pl+Nom:h # ;
+Pl+Gen:ij # ;
+Pl+Acc:ide # ;
+Pl+Ill:ide # ;
+Pl+Ine:ine # ;
+Pl+Ela:jste # ;
+Pl+Com:jgujmie # ;


! Todo: Some symbols from non-ISO code pages do not work

!+PUNCT:"\150" # ; ! trying to capture some hyphens
!+PUNCT:"\151" # ; ! trying to capture some hyphens
! Did not work.
